Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1207
Residential real property; applicability
of act.

The
Nebraska Construction Prompt Pay Act does not apply to improvements to real
property intended for residential purposes when the residence consists of
no more than four residential units.

Laws 2010, LB552, § 7.